New Jersey, session 222, A848.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Beginning in the 2021-2022 school year, each board of education shall provide a civics course for all 11th grade students enrolled in the school district.  The course shall prepare students to become effective citizens, voters, and members of their communities.  The course content shall include information on, but not be limited to: a.     the fundamental principles and processes of democracy; b.    the role of the specific levels of government in New Jersey, including: (1)   municipal governing bodies and local boards of education; (2)   county governments including county executives and boards of county commissioners; and (3)   State government including the Legislative, Executive, and Judicial Branches; c.     the meaning and classification types of the various forms of citizenship; d.    the role and significance of the Electoral College and how the Electoral College  differs from the popular vote; and e.     any other relevant civics topics as the board of education deems appropriate. 2.    Beginning with the 2021-2022 grade 11 class, the State Board of Education shall require that the local graduation requirements adopted by a board of education include one course in civics that covers the course content set forth in section 1 of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.